src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON n_32_nu !  !!= @CODE@ oppinu
+N+Sg       : nom_u ;
+N: PRFPRC_OBL ;

!LEXICON n_11_ruoka ! !!= @CODE@ ruoka-ruovan-ruvan
!+N+Sg+Nom:ruoka K ;
!+N+Sg+Gen:ruovan K ;
!+N+Sg+Gen:ruvan K ;
!+N+Sg+Par:ruokkaa K ;
!+N+Sg+Tra:ruvaksi K ;
!+N+Sg+Tra:ruovaksi K ;
!+N+Sg+Abe:ruvatta K ;
!+N+Sg+Abe:ruovatta K ;
!+N+Sg+Ine:ruvassa K ;
!+N+Sg+Ine:ruovassa K ;
!+N+Sg+Ela:ruvasta K ;
!+N+Sg+Ela:ruovasta K ;
!+N+Sg+Ill:ruokhaan K ;
!+N+Sg+Ade:ruvala K ;
!+N+Sg+Ade:ruovala K ;
!+N+Sg+Abl:ruvalta K ;
!+N+Sg+Abl:ruovalta K ;
!+N+Sg+All:ruvale K ;
!+N+Sg+All:ruovale K ;
!+N+Sg+Ess:ruokana K ;
!+N+Pl+Nom:ruvat K ;
!+N+Pl+Nom:ruovat K ;
!+N+Pl+Gen:ruokkiin K ;
!+N+Pl+Par:ruokkii K ;
!+N+Pl+Tra:ruviksi K ;
!+N+Pl+Tra:ruoviksi K ;
!+N+Pl+Abe:ruvitta K ;
!+N+Pl+Abe:ruovitta K ;
!+N+Pl+Ine:ruvissa K ;
!+N+Pl+Ine:ruovissa K ;
!+N+Pl+Ela:ruvista K ;
!+N+Pl+Ela:ruovista K ;
!+N+Pl+Ill:ruokhiin K ;
!+N+Pl+Ade:ruvila K ;
!+N+Pl+Ade:ruovila K ;
!+N+Pl+Abl:ruvilta K ;
!+N+Pl+Abl:ruovilta K ;
!+N+Pl+All:ruvile K ;
!+N+Pl+All:ruovile K ;
!+N+Pl+Ess:ruokina K ;
!+N+Pl+Com:ruokine K ;


!LEXICON n_11_laissa ! !!= @CODE@ laki-laissa-lajissa
!+N+Sg+Nom:laki K ;
!+N+Sg+Gen:lajin K ;
!+N+Sg+Gen:lain K ;
!+N+Sg+Par:lakkii K ;
!+N+Sg+Tra:lajiksi K ;
!+N+Sg+Tra:laiksi K ;
!+N+Sg+Abe:lajitta K ;
!+N+Sg+Abe:laitta K ;
!+N+Sg+Ine:lajissa K ;
!+N+Sg+Ine:laissa K ;
!+N+Sg+Ela:lajista K ;
!+N+Sg+Ela:laista K ;
!+N+Sg+Ill:lakhiin K ;
!+N+Sg+Ade:lajila K ;
!+N+Sg+Ade:laila K ;
!+N+Sg+Abl:lajilta K ;
!+N+Sg+Abl:lailta K ;
!+N+Sg+All:lajile K ;
!+N+Sg+All:laile K ;
!+N+Sg+Ess:lakina K ;
!+N+Pl+Nom:lajit K ;
!+N+Pl+Nom:lait K ;
!+N+Pl+Gen:lakkiin K ;
!+N+Pl+Par:lakkii K ;
!+N+Pl+Tra:lajiiksi K ;
!+N+Pl+Tra:laiiksi K ;
!+N+Pl+Abe:lajiitta K ;
!+N+Pl+Abe:laiitta K ;
!+N+Pl+Ine:lajiissa K ;
!+N+Pl+Ine:laiissa K ;
!+N+Pl+Ela:lajiista K ;
!+N+Pl+Ela:laiista K ;
!+N+Pl+Ill:lakhiin K ;
!+N+Pl+Ade:lajiila K ;
!+N+Pl+Ade:laiila K ;
!+N+Pl+Abl:lajiilta K ;
!+N+Pl+Abl:laiilta K ;
!+N+Pl+All:lajiile K ;
!+N+Pl+All:laiile K ;
!+N+Pl+Ess:lakiina K ;
!+N+Pl+Com:lakiine K ;

LEXICON n_21_odd_i_poengi ! !!= @CODE@ poengi-poengissa-poengiissa
+N+Sg+Nom:poengi K ;
+N+Sg+Gen:poengin K ;
+N+Sg+Par:poengii K ;
+N+Sg+Tra:poengiksi K ;
+N+Sg+Abe:poengitta K ;
+N+Sg+Ine:poengissa K ;
+N+Sg+Ela:poengista K ;
+N+Sg+Ill:poenghiin K ;
+N+Sg+Ade:poengilla K ;
+N+Sg+Abl:poengilta K ;
+N+Sg+All:poengille K ;
+N+Sg+Ess:poenginna K ;
+N+Pl+Nom:poengit K ;
+N+Pl+Gen:poengiitten K ;
+N+Pl+Par:poengiita K ;
+N+Pl+Tra:poengiiksi K ;
+N+Pl+Abe:poengiitta K ;
+N+Pl+Ine:poengiissa K ;
+N+Pl+Ela:poengiista K ;
+N+Pl+Ill:poenghiin K ;
+N+Pl+Ade:poengiila K ;
+N+Pl+Abl:poengiilta K ;
+N+Pl+All:poengiile K ;
+N+Pl+Ess:poengiina K ;
+N+Pl+Com:poengiine K ;

LEXICON n_21_odd_i_nyansi ! !!= @CODE@ nyansi-nyansissa-nyansiissa
+N+Sg+Nom:nyansi K ;
+N+Sg+Gen:nyansin K ;
+N+Sg+Par:nyanssii K ;
+N+Sg+Tra:nyansiksi K ;
+N+Sg+Abe:nyansitta K ;
+N+Sg+Ine:nyansissa K ;
+N+Sg+Ela:nyansista K ;
+N+Sg+Ill:nyanshiin K ;
+N+Sg+Ade:nyansilla K ;
+N+Sg+Abl:nyansilta K ;
+N+Sg+All:nyansille K ;
+N+Sg+Ess:nyansinna K ;
+N+Pl+Nom:nyansit K ;
+N+Pl+Gen:nyansiitten K ;
+N+Pl+Par:nyanssiita K ;
+N+Pl+Tra:nyansiiksi K ;
+N+Pl+Abe:nyansiitta K ;
+N+Pl+Ine:nyansiissa K ;
+N+Pl+Ela:nyansiista K ;
+N+Pl+Ill:nyanshiin K ;
+N+Pl+Ade:nyansiila K ;
+N+Pl+Abl:nyansiilta K ;
+N+Pl+All:nyansiile K ;
+N+Pl+Ess:nyansiina K ;
+N+Pl+Com:nyansiine K ;


LEXICON n_tuhat ! !!= @CODE@ poengi-poengissa-poengiissa
+N+Sg+Nom:tuhat K ;
+N+Sg+Gen:tuhanen K ;
+N+Sg+Par:tuhatta K ;
+N+Sg+Tra:tuhaneksi K ;
+N+Sg+Abe:tuhanetta K ;
+N+Sg+Ine:tuhanessa K ;
+N+Sg+Ela:tuhanesta K ;
+N+Sg+Ill:tuhantheen K ;
+N+Sg+Ade:tuhanella K ;
+N+Sg+Abl:tuhanelta K ;
+N+Sg+All:tuhanelle K ;
+N+Sg+Ess:tuhantenna K ;
+N+Pl+Nom:tuhanet K ;
+N+Pl+Gen:tuhanssiitten K ;
+N+Pl+Gen:tuhantten K ;
+N+Pl+Par:tuhanssii K ;
+N+Pl+Tra:tuhansiksi K ;
+N+Pl+Abe:tuhansitta K ;
+N+Pl+Ine:tuhansissa K ;
+N+Pl+Ela:tuhansista K ;
+N+Pl+Ill:tunhanshiin K ;
+N+Pl+Ade:tuhansilla K ;
+N+Pl+Abl:tuhansilta K ;
+N+Pl+All:tuhansille K ;
+N+Pl+Ess:tuhansinna K ;
+N+Pl+Com:tuhansinne K ;

!LEXICON vanha_nen  !!= @CODE@ on nainen-sanoille
!  nen_sg ;
!  nen_pl ;

!LEXICON nen_sg
!             +N:     nom-nen        ;
!!            +N:se   nomgen_px      ;
!            +Sg:se     ess_nA        ;
!            +Pl:se%>i2 ess_nA        ;

!! make+N+Pl+kom:sine K              ;
!             +N:se   weak_v_stem ;
!          +N+Sg:s    par_tA         ;
!             +N:se   2AVU_V_ill_sg ;
!
!LEXICON nen_pl
!        +N:se        weak_v_stem ;
! +N+Pl+Ill:sh%>i2in  K              ;
!     +N+Pl:s         gen_ten        ;
!     +N+Pl:ss%>i2i   par_end        ;
!     +N+Pl:sh%>i2    horterillpl   ;
! +N+Pl+Com:s%>i2     com_ne         ;


!LEXICON nom-nen
! +Sg+Nom:nen K ;


!LEXICON loput
!                 obl_strong_odd ; ! muut vahvat
!                 weak_v_stem    ;
!        +Sg:     sgpl_cases_odd ; !! these two lexica for cases with
!        +Pl:%>i2 sgpl_cases_odd ; !! the same affix in sg and pl -- tsekkaa long
!        +Pl:%>i2 gen_ten        ;
! +Pl+Use/NG:%>i2 gen_tten       ;
!        +Pl:%>i2 par_V          ;



!! Basic paradigms
!  ===================


!LEXICON weak_v_stem !!= @CODE@ This bs is gonna get deleted. Replase the genetives with gen_n and just add the nom,
! +Sg: gen_n_sg ;
! +Pl: nom_t    ;


!! ### Sublexica for the basic unified cases, with even and odd variations
! ----------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON sgpl_cases_even !
           +Ade:%>l^A  PxxK              ; ! Lyhyt perusmuoto vuođela
           +All:%>le   PxxK              ; ! Lyhyt perusmuoto
  +Dial/Jok+All:%>let  K                 ; ! pienelet
           +Ade+Err/Orth:%>ll^A  PxxK    ; ! Pitkä perusmuoto väärin
           +All+Err/Orth:%>lle   PxxK    ; ! Pitkä perusmuoto väärin
  +Dial/Jok+All+Err/Orth:%>llet  K       ; ! Pitkä perusmuoto väärin

                       sgpl_cases_common ;

LEXICON sgpl_cases_odd !
           +Ade:%>ll^A PxxK              ; ! Pitkä perusmuoto
           +All:%>lle  PxxK              ; ! Pitkä perusmuoto
  +Dial/Jok+All:%>llet K                 ; ! pieniimillet
           +Ade+Err/Orth:%>l^A  PxxK     ; ! Lyhyt perusmuoto väärin
           +All+Err/Orth:%>le   PxxK     ; ! Lyhyt perusmuoto väärin
  +Dial/Jok+All+Err/Orth:%>let  K        ; ! Lyhyt perusmuoto väärin
                       sgpl_cases_common ;

LEXICON sgpl_cases_even_Por !
           +Ade:%>l^A  PxxK              ; 
           +All:%>le   PxxK              ; 
           +Ade+Err/Orth:%>ll^A  PxxK    ; 
           +All+Err/Orth:%>lle   PxxK    ; 

                       sgpl_cases_common ;

!LEXICON sgpl_cases_odd_Por !
!           +Ade:%>ll^A PxxK              ; 
!           +All:%>lle  PxxK              ; 
!           +Ade+Err/Orth:%>l^A  PxxK     ; 
!           +All+Err/Orth:%>le   PxxK     ; 
!                       sgpl_cases_common ;


LEXICON sgpl_cases_common
           +Abl:%>lt^A PxxK ;
           +Ine:%>ss^A PxxK ;
           +Ela:%>st^A PxxK ;
           +Tra:%>ksi  K    ; ! +Tra:%>kse  Pxx  ;
           +Abe:%>tt^A PxxK ;



!! ### Sublexica for Gen, Par, Ill, Ess and Com.
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------


LEXICON nom_end
 +Nom: K ; ! Why not PxxK ?

LEXICON nom_R
 +Nom: R ;

LEXICON nom_t
 +Nom:%>t K ; ! Why not PxxK ?

LEXICON nom_n
 +Nom:%>n K ; ! Why not PxxK ?

LEXICON nom_u
 +Nom:u K ;

LEXICON nom_nu ! LEXICON a_32_nnu ravistunnu:ravistun
 +Nom:nu K ;

LEXICON nom_lu
 +Nom:lu K ;

LEXICON nom_y
 +Nom:y K ;

LEXICON nom_ny
 +Nom:ny K ;

LEXICON nom_ly
 +Nom:ly K ;

LEXICON gen_n_sg ! Only with sg and general separate, because of R! This is exception!
  gen_n         ; ! why not go from R -> K, then we don't have to write twice
 +Gen:%>n R     ; ! This (R) is for compound words, that's why sg is by itself

LEXICON gen_n
 +Gen:%> n_PxK ;

LEXICON gen_Vn
 +Gen:%>^V n_PxK ;

LEXICON gen_in
 +Gen:%>i n_PxK ;

LEXICON gen_tten  ! vereksitten
 +Gen:%>tte n_PxK ;
