src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
vuosituhat:vuosi n_tuhat ;
kirjanoppinu:kirjan#oppin n_32_nu ;
nyansi: n_21_odd_i_nyansi ;
opintopoengi:opinto n_21_odd_i_poengi ;
pääpoengi:pää n_21_odd_i_poengi ;
poengi: n_21_odd_i_poengi ;
